Hawaii statutes.
§244D-3 Cooperation between department and
liquor commission. The department of taxation and the liquor commission,
if the commission exercises its authority under this chapter, shall cooperate
in the enforcement of this chapter.

The department shall notify the proper liquor
commission of the name and address of every permittee whose permit has been
revoked, and any license issued to the permittee under the liquor law thereupon
shall be deemed forfeited.

The department may notify the proper liquor
commission of the name and address of every person who has failed to file any
return required, or to pay any tax prescribed, or to secure a permit, or to
perform any other duty or act imposed under this chapter, and such liquor
commission shall thereupon suspend any license which may have been issued to
any such person under the liquor law until such time as such person complies
with this chapter.

The liquor commission, if the commission
exercises its authority under this chapter, shall provide to the department the
results of any examination the commission has undertaken pursuant to section
244D-10 and shall, upon request, furnish to the department any information in
its possession relative to any person having a license issued by it, and its
records shall be open to examination of the department. [L Sp 1984 1st, c 1, pt
of §2; am L 1986, c 344, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next